nl: Compatibel astype: 12 × 142 mm steekas; 12 × 148 mm steekas (Boost); 12 × 157 mm steekas (Super Boost); 5 mm snelspanner; Schroefas; Overige
es: Tipo de eje compatible: Eje pasante de 12 × 142 mm; Eje pasante de 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Eje pasante de 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); Cierre rápido de 5 mm; Eje atornillable; Otro
sv: Kompatibel axeltyp: 12 × 142 mm genomgående hjulaxel; 12 × 148 mm genomgående hjulaxel (Boost); 12 × 157 mm genomgående hjulaxel (Super Boost); 5 mm snabbkoppling; Bultad axel; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip de axă compatibilă: Ax traversant 12 × 142 mm; Ax traversant 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Ax traversant 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); Sistem de eliberare rapidă de 5 mm; Ax cu prindere în șuruburi; Altele
ru: Совместимый тип оси: Сквозная ось 12 × 142 мм; Сквозная ось 12 × 148 мм (Boost); Сквозная ось 12 × 157 мм (Super Boost); 5 мм с эксцентриком; Ось на болтах; Другое
nb: Kompatibel akseltype: 12 × 142 mm gjennomgående aksel; 12 × 148 mm gjennomgående aksel (Boost); 12 × 157 mm gjennomgående aksel (Super Boost); 5 mm hurtigkobling; Bolt-on-aksel; Annet
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta osovine: Osovina Thru-Axle 12 × 142 mm; Osovina Thru-Axle 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Osovina Thru-Axle 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); Brzo otpuštanje od 5 mm; Osovina s vijcima; Ostalo
bg-BG: Съвместим тип ос: Проходна ос 12 × 142 mm; Проходна ос 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Проходна ос 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); 5 mm бързо освобождаване; Ос с болтове; Друго
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta osi: 12 × 142 mm prehodna os (thru-axle); 12 × 148 mm prehodna os (Boost); 12 × 157 mm prehodna os (Super Boost); 5 mm hitri zapenjalec; Os z vijaki; Drugo
tr: Uyumlu aks tipi: 12 × 142 mm sokmalı mil; 12 × 148 mm sokmalı mil (Boost); 12 × 157 mm sokmalı mil (Super Boost); 5 mm mandallı; Civatalı mil; Diğer
zh-CN: 适用轴类型: 12 × 142 毫米筒轴; 12 × 148 毫米筒轴 (Boost); 12 × 157 毫米筒轴 (Super Boost); 5 毫米快拆轴; 螺栓轴; 其他
sk-SK: Typ kompatibilnej nápravy: Pevná os 12 × 142 mm; Pevná os 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Pevná os 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); 5 mm rýchloupinák; Skrutkovacia os; Iné
cs: Typ kompatibilní nápravy: 12 × 142 mm pevná osa; 12 × 148 mm pevná osa (Boost); 12 × 157 mm pevná osa (Super Boost); 5 mm rychloupínák; Šroubovací osa; Ostatní
th: ประเภทเพลาที่เข้ากันได้: แกนสอด 12 × 142 มม.; แกนสอด 12 × 148 มม. (Boost); แกนสอด 12 × 157 มม. (Super Boost); แกนปลดเร็ว 5 มม.; แกนแบบขันนอต; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di asse compatibile: Perno passante 12 × 142 mm; Perno passante 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Perno passante 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); Sgancio rapido 5 mm; Perno a bullone; Altro
pl: Zgodny typ osi: Sztywna oś 12 × 142 mm; Sztywna oś 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Sztywna oś 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); Szybkozamykacz 5 mm; Oś przykręcana (bolt-on); Inny
ja: 対応軸タイプ: 12 × 142 mm スルーアクスル; 12 × 148 mm スルーアクスル (Boost); 12 × 157 mm スルーアクスル (Super Boost); 5 mm クイックリリース; ボルトオンアクスル; その他
ko: 호환 액슬 유형: 12 × 142mm 스루 액슬; 12 × 148mm 스루 액슬(부스트); 12 × 157mm 스루 액슬(수퍼 부스트); 5mm 퀵 릴리스; 볼트온 액슬; 기타
hu: Kompatibilis tengelytípus: 12 × 142 mm-es átütőtengely; 12 × 148 mm-es átütőtengely (Boost); 12 × 157 mm-es átütőtengely (Super Boost); 5 mm-es gyorszáras; Csavaros tengely; Egyéb
en: Compatible axle type: 12 × 142 mm thru-axle; 12 × 148 mm thru-axle (Boost); 12 × 157 mm thru-axle (Super Boost); 5 mm quick-release; Bolt-on axle; Other
zh-TW: 相容軸類型: 12 × 142 公釐貫通軸; 12 × 148 公釐貫通軸 (Boost); 12 × 157 公釐貫通軸 (Super Boost); 5 公釐快拆; 螺栓固定軸; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo ašis: 12 × 142 mm perkišama ašis; 12 × 148 mm perkišama ašis („Boost“); 12 × 157 mm perkišama ašis („Super Boost“); 5 mm greitai atleidžiama ašis; Prisukama ašis; Kita
fr: Type d'essieu compatible: Axe traversant 12 × 142 mm; Axe traversant 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Axe traversant 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); Dégagement rapide 5 mm; Axe à visser; Autre
de: Kompatibler Achsentyp: 12 × 142 mm Steckachse; 12 × 148 mm Steckachse (Boost); 12 × 157 mm Steckachse (Super Boost); 5 mm Schnellspanner; Schraubachse; Sonstige
fi: Yhteensopiva akselityyppi: 12 × 142 mm läpiakseli; 12 × 148 mm läpiakseli (Boost); 12 × 157 mm läpiakseli (Super Boost); 5 mm pikalinkku; Mutteriakseli; Muu
da: Kompatibel akseltype: 12 × 142 mm thru-axle; 12 × 148 mm thru-axle (Boost); 12 × 157 mm thru-axle (Super Boost); 5 mm quick-release; Bolt-on-aksel; Andet
vi: Loại trục tương thích: Trục xuyên 12 × 142 mm; Trục xuyên 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Trục xuyên 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); Trục tháo lắp nhanh 5 mm; Trục bắt ốc; Khác
el: Συμβατός τύπος άξονα: Περαστός άξονας 12 × 142 mm; Περαστός άξονας 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Περαστός άξονας 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); Quick-release 5 mm; Βιδωτός άξονας; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de eixo compatível: Eixo passante de 12 × 142 mm; Eixo passante de 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Eixo passante de 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); Aperto rápido de 5 mm; Eixo aparafusado; Outro
pt-BR: Tipo de eixo compatível: Eixo passante de 12 × 142 mm; Eixo passante de 12 × 148 mm (Boost); Eixo passante de 12 × 157 mm (Super Boost); Desengate rápido de 5 mm; Eixo aparafusado; Outro